Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.090

Venue for petition—Petition and hearing requirements—Notice of hearing.

The petition for an award, for an increased or modified award, or for the exemption of assets from the claims of creditors as authorized by this chapter must be made to the court of the county in which the probate is being administered. If probate proceedings have not been commenced in the state of Washington, the petition must be made to the court of a county in which the decedent was domiciled at the time of death. If the decedent was not domiciled in the state of Washington at the time of death, the petition may be made to the court of any county in which the decedent's estate could be administered under RCW 11.96A.050. The petition and the hearing must conform to RCW 11.96A.080 through 11.96A.200. Notice of the hearing on the petition must be given in accordance with RCW 11.96A.110.

[ 1999 c 42 s 613; 1997 c 252 s 56.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.